North Dakota, session 69, HB1504.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 37-14-14 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
37-14-14. Veterans' postwar trust fund.
1. The veterans' postwar trust fund is a permanent trust fund of the state of North Dakota and
consists of moneys transferred or credited to the fund under this chapter and other laws.
Investment of the fund is the responsibility of the state treasurer who shall have full authority
to invest the fund only in accordance with chapter 21-10. All income received from
investments is to be utilized only for programs of benefit and service to veterans or their
dependents, and all income earned in a biennium is appropriated to the administrative
committee on veterans' affairs on a continuing basis in the following biennium and not in the
biennium the income is earned for expenditure on these programs as authorized by law.
Investment of all income received from investments is the responsibility of the state treasurer
who has full authority to invest the income received only in accordance with chapter 21-10.
2. A veterans organization as defined under section 53 - 06.1 - 01 may donate funds to the
veterans' postwar trust fund for homeless veterans' services to prevent and eliminate veteran
homelessness.

H. B. NO. 1504 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1504.
House Vote: Yeas 89 Nays 0 Absent 4
Senate Vote: Yeas 45 Nays 0 Absent 2
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State